Tennessee, session 114, SB1957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Religious Freedom
Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-203(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(17) Open a meeting of the board of education with a prayer led by a member of
the board of education; provided, that:
(A) The prayer does not require participation of any person in attendance
at the meeting; and
(B) No person is harassed or coerced to participate in the prayer.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011682